Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Miscellaneous Provisions

243.895.
Warning of dangers of drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy to be posted.

All licensed retailers of alcoholic beverages, except holders of special temporary licenses, shall post in a prominent place easily seen by patrons a printed sign at least eight and one-half (8-1/2) inches by eleven (11) inches in size, with gender-neutral language supplied by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, which shall warn that drinking alcoholic beverages prior to conception or during pregnancy can cause birth defects.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 442, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 513, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 566, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 584, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 88, effective June 29, 2017.

243.897.
Prohibition against purchase of metal beer keg except from brewer or representative.

No recycler, scrap metal dealer, or scrap yard operator may purchase any metal beer keg, whether damaged or undamaged, except from the brewer or its authorized representative, if:

The keg is clearly marked as the property of a brewery manufacturer; or

The keg’s identification markings have been made illegible.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 83, § 10, effective July 15, 2008.